Tennessee, session 114, HB1960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-602(b)(2)(J), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(J) The department shall recommend to the state board of education the
intervention option for a priority school assigned to tier three (3) of the progressive tiered
intervention system. The state board shall notify the priority school of the intervention
option selected by the state board. The priority school shall implement the state board-
selected intervention option.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1960
011971
- 1 -